Hawaii statutes.
§657-5 Domestic judgments and decrees.
Unless an extension is granted, every judgment and decree of any court of the
State shall be presumed to be paid and discharged at the expiration of ten
years after the judgment or decree was rendered. No action shall be commenced
after the expiration of ten years from the date a judgment or decree was
rendered or extended. No extension of a judgment or decree shall be granted
unless the extension is sought within ten years of the date the original
judgment or decree was rendered. A court shall not extend any judgment or
decree beyond twenty years from the date of the original judgment or decree.
No extension shall be granted without notice and the filing of a non-hearing
motion or a hearing motion to extend the life of the judgment or decree. [CC
1859, §1051; RL 1925, §2643; am L 1927, c 16, §1; RL 1935, §3914; RL 1945,
§10425; RL 1955, §241-5; HRS §657-5; am L 1972, c 105, §1(d); am L 1992, c 74,
§1; am L 2001, c 145, §1]

Case Notes

District court erred in extending the judgment pursuant to a
request that was not made within ten years after the original judgment was
rendered. 536 F.3d 980 (2008).

Statute does not run during period decree not enforceable due
to interest of a life tenant not subject to plaintiff's claim. 20 H. 225
(1910).

Applied to action seeking enforcement of promissory note
where note was enforceable only as part of final divorce decree. 73 H. 566,
836 P.2d 1081 (1992).

Garnishment order conclusively presumed to be paid and
discharged upon expiration of underlying judgment. 82 H. 197, 921 P.2d 117
(1996).

General scheme of §653-11 and this section is to terminate a
judgment when judgment is actually paid or presumed to be paid as a matter of
law. 82 H. 197, 921 P.2d 117 (1996).

Under this section, judgment, together with all rights and
remedies appurtenant to it, are conclusively presumed paid and discharged after
ten years unless timely renewed. 82 H. 197, 921 P.2d 117 (1996).

This section controls over HRCP rule 5(a); thus, notice of a
proposed extension of a judgment pursuant to this section must be provided to
the judgment debtor prior to the granting of the extension, even if the debtor
is in default and is not required under rule 5(a) to be served with pleadings;
although failure to provide notice under §657-7 was error, error was harmless
where debtor never appeared to defend debtor's self, had an opportunity to be
heard at a HRCP rule 60(b) hearing, and offered no defense on the merits to the
original judgment or extension, and thus failed to demonstrate any prejudice.
120 H. 1, 200 P.3d 370 (2008).

Based on the plain language of this section, and construed in
pari materia within the framework of the entire statutory scheme governing
limitations of actions, "original judgment" of this section refers to
the judgment that creates the rights and responsibilities that the party is
seeking to extend. 121 H. 59, 214 P.3d 598 (2009).

Trial court properly extended the second amended judgment to
October 17, 2019, which was less than twenty years from the date of the
"original judgment" date of October 18, 1999; however, trial court
erred by extending the fourth amended judgment, filed on September 6, 2001, to
September 5, 2021, where the "original judgment" date for purposes of
extending the fourth amended judgment was the third amended judgment date of
June 26, 2000, and the court was precluded from extending the fourth amended
judgment beyond June 25, 2020. 121 H. 59, 214 P.3d 598 (2009).

Where an unextended judgment is "amended in a material
and substantial respect", so that it creates the rights that are being
extended, the time within which a motion to extend the judgment may be brought
"begins to run from the date of the amendment", because that judgment
created those rights; where, on the other hand, the unextended judgment merely
makes non-substantive or non-material amendments to a prior judgment, it does
not create an enforceable right and it is not appropriate that the amended
judgment extend the time allowed to revive the enforceable judgment. 121 H.
59, 214 P.3d 598 (2009).

Where multiple judgments create the same rights that the
party is seeking to extend, the "original judgment" is (1) the
unamended judgment where the amended judgment makes non-material amendments to
a prior judgment, but (2) the amended judgment where it amended the prior
judgment "in a material and substantial respect". 121 H. 59, 214
P.3d 598 (2009).

Where the second amended judgment dated October 18, 1999
materially and substantially changed the first-in-time judgment and amended
judgment, the second amended judgment was the "original judgment" on
the false imprisonment and battery claims against defendant; as petitioner's
motion to extend the second amended judgment on May 8, 2007 was filed within
ten years of the date of the original judgment, the trial court properly
ordered that the second amended judgment be extended. 121 H. 59, 214 P.3d 598
(2009).

Where the third amended judgment dated June 26, 2000 was
amended by the fourth amended judgment on September 6, 2001, but the fourth
amended judgment was a non-substantive change, the "original
judgment" for purposes of extending the fourth amended judgment was the
third amended judgment date; as petitioners sought to extend the fourth amended
judgment on May 8, 2007 within ten years of June 26, 2000, the trial court was
permitted to extend the fourth amended judgment. 121 H. 59, 214 P.3d 598
(2009).

Limitations period begins to run on each child support
payment as it becomes due; decree creditor may avoid effect of statute of
limitations on part of decree debt for which statute has not run by obtaining
new decree on unbarred debt. 6 H. App. 201, 716 P.2d 496 (1986).

License revocation order is more like administrative order
than judgment subject to ten-year limitations period. 9 H. App. 169, 828 P.2d
1287 (1992).

The notice requirement contained in this section does not
apply to defaulted parties who have not appeared; thus, defendant, as a
judgment debtor in default, was not entitled to notice of extension proceedings
instituted pursuant to this section. 118 H. 132 (App.), 185 P.3d 880 (2008).

Cited: 9 H. 514, 517 (1894).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next